Washington statutes.
RCW 18.310.030

Immunity.

The director or individuals acting on behalf of the director are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on any acts performed in the course of their duties except for their intentional or willful misconduct.

[ 2010 c 179 s 3.]